New York, session 2025-2026, S5947.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule or regu- 2 lation to the contrary, the town of Pavilion in Genesee county and the 3 town of Covington in Wyoming county have adopted a joint resolution 4 providing for the adoption of a plan to authorize the town of Pavilion, 5 Genesee county, to share and hold justice court in the town of Coving- 6 ton, Wyoming county, pursuant to an agreement made between such towns 7 for the use of such court. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08644-02-5